Xcode.app/Contents/Developer/Platforms/iPhoneOS.platform/Library/Developer/CoreSimulator/Profiles/Runtimes/iOS.simruntime/Contents/Resources/RuntimeRoot/System/Library/ScreenReader/BrailleTables/LiblouisBrailleTranslator.brailletable/liblouis/tables/vi-vn-g2.ctb
#-index-name: Vietnamese, contracted
#-display-name: Vietnamese contracted braille
#+language: vi
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+dots: 6
#+direction: forward
#+system: vietnam
#-copyright: Sao Mai Center for the Blind <www.saomaicenter.org/en>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#  Copyright (C) 2018 by Sao Mai Center for the Blind <www.saomaicenter.org/en>
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
# Created and maintained by: Dang Hoai Phuc <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
#-author: Dang Hoai Ph
c <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
#-maintainer-name: Dang Hoai Phuc
#-maintainer-email: danghoaiphuc@gmail.com
#-updated: 2020-11-17
# Based on
# <https://www.saomaicenter.org/en/blog/accessible-formats/rules-and-guidelines-contracted-vietnamese-braille-grade-2>
include vi-charsdef.uti
# Braille indicators definition
numsign 3456
#letsign 6
# caps indicator
capsletter 46
begcapsword 456
endcapsword 46-13
lencapsphrase 5
begcapsphrase 46-46
begcaps 46-46
endcaps 46-13
# no letter sign before Vietnamese single-letter words
#noletsign 
#word a =
#word e =
#word 
#word i =
#word o =
#word 
#word 
#word u =
#word 
#word y =
#noletsignbefore ',
# words contraction
match %[_^] bi
t %[_^] 12
match %[_^] b
n %[_^] 23
match %[_^] b
ng %[_^] 2356
match %[_^] b
i %[_^] 56-12
match %[_^] b
o %[_^] 26-12
match %[_^] b
ng %[_^] 36-12
match %[_^] b
 %[_^] 26-56
match %[_^] b
t %[_^] 35-12
match %[_^] b
o %[_^] 35-23
match %[_^] b
 %[_^] 6-12
match %[_^] b
n %[_^] 6-23
match %[_^] c
a %[_^] 14
match %[_^] c
c %[_^] 25
match %[_^] c
i %[_^] 35-25
match %[_^] con %[_^] 36
match %[_^] c
ng %[_^] 56-14
match %[_^] c
 %[_^] 26-14
match %[_^] c
a %[_^] 26-25
match %[_^] cu
c %[_^] 6-14
match %[_^] c
n %[_^] 56-25
match %[_^] c
ng %[_^] 56-36
match %[_^] c
ng %[_^] 36-14
match %[_^] c
 %[_^] 36-25
match %[_^] c
 %[_^] 35-14
match %[_^] c
 %[_^] 35-36
match %[_^] c
ng %[_^] 6-25
match %[_^] cho %[_^] 146
match %[_^] ch
 %[_^] 36-146
match %[_^] ch
 %[_^] 56-146
match %[_^] ch
 %[_^] 26-146
match %[_^] ch
 %[_^] 6-146
match %[_^] ch
ng %[_^] 35-146
match %[_^] do %[_^] 145
match %[_^] d1 %[_^] 256
match %[_^] d
i %[_^] 56-145
match %[_^] d
u %[_^] 56-256
match %[_^] d
p %[_^] 35-145
match %[_^] d
c %[_^] 35-256
match %[_^] d
o %[_^] 26-145
match %[_^] d
 %[_^] 26-256
match %[_^] d
n %[_^] 6-145
match %[_^] d
ng %[_^] 6-256
match %[_^] d
n %[_^] 36-145
match %[_^] di
n %[_^] 36-256
match %[_^] 
i %[_^] 2346
match %[_^] 
u %[_^] 56-2346
match %[_^] 
n %[_^] 35-2346
match %[_^] 
c %[_^] 6-2346
match %[_^] 
 %[_^] 36-2346
match %[_^] g
n %[_^] 1245
match %[_^] g
p %[_^] 2356
match %[_^] g
i %[_^] 6-1245
match %[_^] g
n %[_^] 6-2356
match %[_^] g
p %[_^] 35-1245
match %[_^] g
i %[_^] 35-2356
match %[_^] g
 %[_^] 36-1245
match %[_^] g
 %[_^] 36-2356
match %[_^] h
n %[_^] 125
match %[_^] hay %[_^] 236
match %[_^] h
ng %[_^] 56-125
match %[_^] h
i %[_^] 56-236
match %[_^] h
i %[_^] 26-125
match %[_^] hi
u %[_^] 26-236
match %[_^] h
y %[_^] 36-125
match %[_^] h
ng %[_^] 36-236
match %[_^] h
t %[_^] 35-125
match %[_^] h
ng %[_^] 35-236
match %[_^] h
 %[_^] 6-125
match %[_^] h
c %[_^] 6-236
match %[_^] g
 %[_^] 245
match %[_^] gi
a %[_^] 356
match %[_^] gi
p %[_^] 35-245
match %[_^] gi
 %[_^] 35-356
match %[_^] gi
 %[_^] 56-356
match %[_^] gi
 %[_^] 56-245
match %[_^] gi
 %[_^] 36-245
match %[_^] gi
 %[_^] 36-356
match %[_^] gi
ng %[_^] 6-245
match %[_^] kia %[_^] 13
match %[_^] k
 %[_^] 26-13
match %[_^] ki
m %[_^] 26-46
match %[_^] k
o %[_^] 35-13
match %[_^] k
t %[_^] 35-46
match %[_^] ki
n %[_^] 6-13
match %[_^] khi %[_^] 12356
match %[_^] kh
ng %[_^] 26-135
match %[_^] kh
p %[_^] 35-12356
match %[_^] kh
i %[_^] 26-12356
match %[_^] l
 %[_^] 123
match %[_^] l
m %[_^] 56-123
match %[_^] l
n %[_^] 56-456
match %[_^] l
a %[_^] 26-123
match %[_^] l
 %[_^] 26-456
match %[_^] l
n %[_^] 36-123
match %[_^] l
m %[_^] 36-456
match %[_^] l
c %[_^] 35-123
match %[_^] l
n %[_^] 35-456
match %[_^] l
i %[_^] 6-123
match %[_^] lo
i %[_^] 6-456
match %[_^] m
 %[_^] 134
match %[_^] m
nh %[_^] 56-134
match %[_^] m
 %[_^] 26-134
match %[_^] m
i %[_^] 36-134
match %[_^] mu
n %[_^] 35-134
match %[_^] m
t %[_^] 6-134
match %[_^] m
t %[_^] 24
match %[_^] n
n %[_^] 1345
match %[_^] n
y %[_^] 56-1345
match %[_^] n
i %[_^] 26-1345
match %[_^] n
a %[_^] 36-1345
match %[_^] n
u %[_^] 35-1345
match %[_^] n
i %[_^] 6-1345
match %[_^] ng
i %[_^] 346
match %[_^] ng
y %[_^] 56-346
match %[_^] ng
 %[_^] 26-346
match %[_^] ngh
 %[_^] 36-346
match %[_^] ng
n %[_^] 6-346
match %[_^] nh
ng %[_^] 1246
match %[_^] nh
 %[_^] 12346
match %[_^] nhi
u %[_^] 56-1246
match %[_^] nh
 %[_^] 26-1246
match %[_^] nh
ng %[_^] 36-1246
match %[_^] nh
 %[_^] 35-1246
match %[_^] nh
n %[_^] 6-1246
match %[_^] ph
i %[_^] 124
match %[_^] ph
a %[_^] 235
match %[_^] ph
n %[_^] 56-124
match %[_^] ph
ng %[_^] 56-235
match %[_^] ph
n %[_^] 35-124
match %[_^] ph
n %[_^] 35-235
match %[_^] ph
m %[_^] 6-124
match %[_^] ph
n %[_^] 6-235
match %[_^] quy
t %[_^] 12345
match %[_^] quy
n %[_^] 56-12345
match %[_^] qu
 %[_^] 26-12345
match %[_^] qu
 %[_^] 36-12345
match %[_^] qu
 %[_^] 35-12345
match %[_^] r
t %[_^] 1235
match %[_^] r
i %[_^] 56-1235
match %[_^] r
 %[_^] 36-1235
match %[_^] r
t %[_^] 35-1235
match %[_^] r
ng %[_^] 6-1235
match %[_^] sau %[_^] 234
match %[_^] s
 %[_^] 26-234
match %[_^] s
 %[_^] 36-234
match %[_^] s
ng %[_^] 35-234
match %[_^] s
 %[_^] 6-234
match %[_^] t
i %[_^] 2345
match %[_^] t
 %[_^] 56-2345
match %[_^] t
nh %[_^] 26-2345
match %[_^] ti
ng %[_^] 35-2345
match %[_^] t
i %[_^] 6-2345
match %[_^] th
 %[_^] 2456
match %[_^] th
ng %[_^] 26-2456
match %[_^] th
nh %[_^] 56-2456
match %[_^] th
y %[_^] 35-2456
match %[_^] th
t %[_^] 6-2456
match %[_^] trong %[_^] 23456
match %[_^] tr
n %[_^] 12456
match %[_^] tr
i %[_^] 56-23456
match %[_^] tr
 %[_^] 26-23456
match %[_^] tr
ng %[_^] 35-23456
match %[_^] tr
n %[_^] 6-23456
match %[_^] anh %[_^] 156
match %[_^] 
y %[_^] 16
match %[_^] 
 %[_^] 345
match %[_^] v
 %[_^] 1236
match %[_^] v
 %[_^] 56-1236
match %[_^] v
o %[_^] 3456
match %[_^] v
 %[_^] 26-1236
match %[_^] v
n %[_^] 36-1236
match %[_^] v
i %[_^] 35-1236
match %[_^] vi
c %[_^] 6-1236
match %[_^] xin %[_^] 1346
match %[_^] xu
ng %[_^] 35-1346
match %[_^] x
 %[_^] 36-1346
match %[_^] x
 %[_^] 56-1346
match %[_^] xu
ng %[_^] 35-1346
# include vi-vn-g1.ctb
#vowel groups
match %a i
 %a 34
match %a i
 %a 35-34
match %a i
 %a 56-34
match %a i
 %a 26-34
match %a i
 %a 36-34
match %a i
 %a 6-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] y
 %a 34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] y
 %a 35-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] y
 %a 56-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] y
 %a 26-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] y
 %a 36-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] y
 %a 6-34
word o
 35-135-1
word o
 56-135-1
word o
 26-135-1
word o
 36-135-1
word o
 6-135-1
word oa =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oa %[a_.^] 4
word 
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
a %[a_.^] 35-4
word 
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
a %[a_.^] 56-4
word 
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
a %[a_.^] 26-4
word 
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
a %[a_.^] 36-4
word 
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
a %[a_.^] 6-4
# processing the case of tone marks on letter a
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 35-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 56-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 26-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 36-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 6-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %a 5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %a 35-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %a 56-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %a 26-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %a 36-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %a 6-5
word oe =
word 
word 
word 
word 
word 
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oe %[a_.^] 2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
e %[_.^] 35-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
e %[_.^] 56-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
e %[_.^] 26-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
e %[_.^] 36-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
e %[_.^] 6-2
# processing the tone marks placed on letter e
word o
 35-135-15
word o
 56-135-15
word o
 26-135-15
word o
 36-135-15
word o
 6-135-15
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 35-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 56-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 26-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 36-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] o
 %[a_.^] 6-2
word u
word u
 35-136-126
word u
 56-136-126
word u
 26-136-126
word u
 36-136-126
word u
 6-136-126
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %[a_.^] 3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %[a_.^] 35-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %[a_.^] 56-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %[a_.^] 26-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %[a_.^] 36-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %[a_.^] 6-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
 %a 156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
 %a 35-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
 %a 56-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
 %a 26-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
 %a 36-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] 
 %a 6-156
match %a u
 %[_.^] 26-136-246
match %a u
 %[_.^] 56-136-246
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 35-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 56-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 26-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 36-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 6-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 35-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 56-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 26-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 36-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] u
 %a 6-25
match %a uy %[a_.^] 45
match %a 
y %[a_.^] 35-45
match %a 
y %[a_.^] 56-45
match %a 
y %[a_.^] 26-45
match %a 
y %[a_.^] 36-45
match %a 
y %[a_.^] 6-45
# processing tone marks placed on letter y
word u
 35-136-13456
word u
 56-136-13456
word u
 26-136-13456
word u
 36-136-13456
word u
 6-136-13456
match %a u
 %[a_.^] 35-45
match %a u
 %[a_.^] 56-45
match %a u
 %[a_.^] 26-45
match %a u
 %[a_.^] 36-45
match %a u
